Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 19

Garbage and Rubbish Collection and Disposal Services

5-19-101. Power granted to counties.

The several counties of this state are hereby authorized to provide garbage and rubbish collection services or garbage and rubbish disposal services, or both, to the entire county or to special districts within the county as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1901.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1 provided that references in this chapter to the commissioner or the state department of health are amended to become references to the commissioner or department of environment and conservation.

Cross-References. Air pollution control, title 68, ch. 201.

Hazardous substances, title 68, ch. 131.

Hazardous waste management, title 68, ch. 212.

Sanitary landfill areas, title 68, ch. 213.

Solid waste disposal, title 68, ch. 211.

Urban type public facilities, title 5, ch. 16.

Attorney General Opinions. Use of general revenue to subsidize garbage collection rates, OAG 97-007, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/27/97).

5-19-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Garbage and rubbish collection service” means and includes all operations of all manpower and equipment, whether employed or owned by the county or by some other entity, public or private, with which the county may choose to contract, for the gathering, removal and transporting of refuse produced by the area to be served;

“Garbage and rubbish disposal service” means and includes all composting or other processing plants, incinerators, sanitary landfills and all other sites or facilities for the receiving, processing and getting rid of collected refuse, whether publicly or privately owned or operated, or both; and

“Other governing body” means only that body having the taxing authority.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1902.

5-19-103. Resolution authorizing services.

For the exercise of the powers conferred by this chapter, a county shall authorize same by resolution adopted by a majority of the county legislative body or other governing body. Such resolution shall provide for the exercise of such powers by either:

Some agency or officer of the county already in existence;

A county sanitation department to be created;

A board established as provided in § 5-19-104; or

Contractual arrangements the county may make between itself and any municipality, any utility or other service district, any private organization or any combination of such entities engaged in garbage and rubbish collection services or garbage and rubbish disposal services, or both. In the event all such county services are to be rendered exclusively by such contractual arrangements, the contracts involved shall be negotiated by the county mayor, shall be subject to the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body and may be administered by the county mayor without the appointment of a superintendent, as provided for in § 5-19-105, being required.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 35; T.C.A., § 5-1903; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Single county solid waste regions that elect not to create solid waste authorities, OAG 96-041, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (3/13/96).

5-19-104. County board of sanitation.

In the event the resolution provides for the exercise of the powers provided for in this chapter by a board, upon the approval of the resolution, the county mayor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body or other governing body, three (3) persons to constitute what shall be known as “the county board of sanitation,” which appointees shall serve for one (1), two (2), and three (3) years respectively, from July 1 next succeeding the date of appointment.

Successors to such appointees shall each be appointed for a term of three (3) years by the county mayor, subject to confirmation as provided for in subdivision (a)(1).

The county mayor shall in like manner fill any vacancies that may occur for the unexpired terms thereof.

Each member shall give such bond as may be required by resolution of the county legislative body or other governing body.

The salary or per diem payment, if any, for service on the county board of sanitation shall be established by resolution of the county legislative body. Necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties shall be paid by the county.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum.

The board shall elect its own chair, and shall be authorized to employ such clerical help as may be necessary.

The board shall hold public meetings at least once each month at such regular time and place as the board may determine, and special meetings upon the call of the chair.

The board shall establish its own rules of procedure.

Any member of the board may be removed from office for cause upon a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the county legislative body or other governing body, but only after preferment of formal charges by a resolution of a majority of such governing body and following a public hearing before it.

Before the board shall adopt any proposed budget or salary plan for its employees, it shall submit same to the county legislative body or other governing body for approval or rejection.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1904; Acts 1998, ch. 730, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-19-105. Supervision generally — Office of superintendent.

The general supervision and control of the acquisition, improvement, operation and maintenance of all such refuse collection or disposal systems, or both, as provided in this chapter shall be in charge of the county legislative body or other governing body or other agency as provided in this chapter.

If the powers of this chapter, other than those exercised exclusively by contractual arrangements, are exercised by an agency other than the county legislative body or other governing body or by other than the board as provided in this chapter, such agency shall have at its head a person to be known as a superintendent, to be appointed by the county mayor, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body or other governing body, and if such powers are exercised by a board, such board shall appoint a superintendent.

The superintendent, in any case where a superintendent is required, shall be a person who shall be qualified by training and experience for supervision over the maintenance and operation of the facilities and services as provided in this chapter.

Such person need not be a resident of the county or of the state at the time of such person's selection.

In the event that the powers as provided in this chapter are exercised by an agency other than the board as provided in this chapter, the salary of the superintendent shall be fixed by the county legislative body or other governing body.

If such powers are exercised by the board as provided in this chapter, the salary shall be fixed by the board, subject to approval of the county legislative body or other governing body.

In either case, the superintendent shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority and shall be subject to removal by that authority at any time.

Within the limits of the funds available therefor, all powers to acquire, improve, operate and maintain the facilities and services as herein provided, and all powers necessary or convenient thereto, conferred by this chapter shall be exercised on behalf of the county by the county legislative body or other governing body or by the board, or other designated agency, and the superintendent respectively.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1905; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Duties of superintendent, § 5-19-110.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-19-106. Intergovernmental cooperation.

In connection with the operation of any refuse collection or disposal equipment or facility as provided in this chapter, the superintendent, or the board in the event the powers conferred by this chapter are exercised through a board, with the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body, or the county legislative body or other governing body is hereby authorized to enter into contracts with other governmental units or agencies, federal, state or local, including municipalities, towns, utility districts and improvement districts within the county or with private contractors, for furnishing services, equipment and facilities within the purview of this chapter, and to enter into cooperative arrangements and agreements for providing such services and facilities, upon terms deemed advantageous by the agency involved.

The county legislative body or other governing body, or other agency involved with the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body, is authorized to enter into contracts with any of the governmental units described in subsection (a) or private entities to provide or share in the provision of any refuse collection or disposal equipment, facility or service and for the joint operation thereof, and to make or pay charges in connection therewith by written agreement with such unit or entity.

All governmental units subject to the jurisdiction of the state are hereby authorized to enter into contracts with the appropriate agency prescribed herein for the providing of any refuse collection or disposal equipment, facility or service within the purview of this chapter, and to otherwise cooperate in furnishing such facilities, equipment or services upon any terms deemed to be mutually advantageous.

In any cooperative undertaking with any other governmental unit or entity, or in a contract with any private contractor, as described in this section for furnishing any of the facilities, equipment or services contemplated in this chapter, the county's share of the costs may be financed in the same manner as is provided for in § 5-19-111 to discharge direct county costs for such facilities, equipment or services.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1906.

Cross-References. Intergovernmental cooperation, urban type facilities, § 5-16-107.

Interlocal cooperation with municipalities or contiguous counties, §§ 5-1-113, 5-1-114.

5-19-107. Powers of counties.

The several counties are empowered to do all things necessary to provide such county-wide or special district garbage and rubbish collection service or garbage and rubbish disposal service, or both, including, but not limited to:

Sue and be sued;

Take or acquire real or personal property of every kind, or any interest therein within the county, by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease, and hold, manage, occupy, dispose of, convey, and encumber the same and create a leasehold interest in the same for the benefit of the county;

Exercise the right of eminent domain;

Establish, equip, operate and maintain the services, or any of them, authorized by this chapter and establish and enforce regulations including, but not limited to, those for the administration, operation and maintenance thereof;

Appoint and employ necessary employees and define their qualifications, duties and responsibilities, and provide for payment in reasonable sums for such duties;

Employ counsel;

Enter into and perform all necessary contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts with incorporated towns and cities, or with utility districts, within or without the county, or with private contractors, to provide such services within or without their corporate limits, contracts to provide or to be provided training and maintenance, contracts with one (1) or more other counties or with one (1) or more municipalities in other counties for joint provision of such services, contracts for purchasing or leasing necessary equipment, contracts for the performance of any or all operations involved in the provision of such services either on a district, or on a county-wide basis, or on an intergovernmental basis;

Provide and maintain all special service functions necessary to the implementation of this chapter, such as, but not limited to, the services of the county sanitarian in the inspection of all refuse processing or disposing operations within the county;

Make regulations that shall have the force of law governing all collection and disposal operations and practices entered into under the terms of this chapter;

Set the boundaries of special refuse disposal districts established under the terms of this chapter;

Establish schedules of, and collect reasonable charges for, any services rendered in any district or area that are not covered by the special tax levy authorized in § 5-19-108 or § 5-19-109 for garbage and rubbish collection or disposal, or both, in that district or area; and

Make written agreements for the allocation and conveyance to any annexing municipality of any or all public functions, rights, duties, property, assets and liabilities of a county-wide or district system within or without the area annexed, or to be annexed, that justice and reason may require in the circumstances.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 6; T.C.A., § 5-1907.

Compiler's Notes. There is no specific statutory provision for “the county sanitarian” referred to in this section although there is authority to “appoint and employ necessary employees” in subdivision (5).

Attorney General Opinions. County control over collection and disposal programs, OAG 96-063, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 62 (4/8/96).

5-19-108. Tax levy.

Such garbage and rubbish collection and disposal services may be financed in whole or in part by a levy of a tax on all property in the county only if all persons in the county are to be equally served, but such a county-wide levy shall be unlawful if any city, town or special district in any city or town, that, through its own forces or by contract, provides such services within its boundaries, or if any other part of the county is to be excluded from the service area.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 7; T.C.A., § 5-1908.

5-19-109. Service districts.

If less than all persons in the county are to be served, the county, if it chooses to enter into garbage and rubbish collection and disposal activities, must establish a district or districts within which the service is to be provided.

Such county must pay the full costs of the services to be provided either:

From the proceeds of a tax levied only on property within the district or districts;

From the proceeds of a schedule of service charges levied upon the recipients of the services in the district or districts; or

From a combination of both such a tax levy and service charge levy.

The county legislative body or other governing body may, in its discretion, allocate from among the general funds otherwise available to it an amount sufficient to compensate the garbage and rubbish disposal operation for the use of disposal facilities by persons other than those who reside in the districts served, and may reduce the cost to be recovered from such district or districts by a like amount.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 8; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1909.

Attorney General Opinions. County control over collection and disposal programs, OAG 96-063, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 62 (4/8/96).

Inability to use wheel tax revenues to fund waste disposal, OAG 99-137, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 171 (7/22/99).

5-19-110. Superintendent — Powers and duties.

The superintendent, in all cases in which that office is created, has charge of all actual construction and of the immediate management and operation of all the services, equipment and facilities provided for in this chapter which are owned and operated by the county and of the enforcement of all rules, regulations, programs, plans and decisions of the board or governing body and of the administration of all contracts between the county and other entities covering refuse collection and disposal services.

Within the limits of a budget and of a salary plan to be approved by the county governing body, the superintendent shall hire all employees and fix their duties, except that the engagement of technical consultants, advisers and legal assistants shall be subject to the approval of the governing body.

The superintendent, with the approval of the governing body, may fix the compensation of all employees.

The superintendent, with the approval of the governing body, may acquire and dispose of all property, real and personal, necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Title to such property shall in all cases be taken in the name of the county.

The superintendent, subject to the approval of the governing body, shall let all contracts.

The superintendent may, however, make purchases of personalty up to a cost of five hundred dollars ($500), within budgetary limits, without the approval of the governing body, subject, however, to such rules governing such purchases as the governing body may prescribe.

Any contract for construction exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be advertised by the superintendent for bids.

Where the county has a central purchasing authority, purchases made for the purposes herein contemplated shall be processed through such authority.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 9; T.C.A., § 5-1910.

Cross-References. Superintendent, creation of office, appointment, compensation, § 5-19-105.

5-19-111. Bonds.

The county legislative body, or other governing body, of the county is hereby authorized to issue bonds of the county for the purpose of financing the cost of the establishment, construction, installation or acquisition of any refuse collection or disposal equipment or facility.

Bonds so issued may be either general obligation bonds of the county secured by the full faith and credit and taxing power of the county, or by taxes levied on property in a specified district, or revenue bonds secured by the revenues derived from the operation of the refuse collection or disposal equipment or facility financed thereby, or by a combination of such revenues and the unpledged revenues derived by the county from any other refuse collection or disposal equipment or facility owned and operated by the county, or combination revenue-general obligation deficiency bonds secured primarily by revenues and secondarily by the taxing power of the county.

Any bonds issued by the county for the purpose of financing refuse collection or disposal equipment or facilities shall be issued in the manner and form prescribed by the applicable provisions of title 9, chapter 21.

In the issuance of bonds, any refuse collection or disposal equipment or facility so financed shall be deemed to be a “public works project,” as defined in title 9, chapter 21, and all power and authority conferred upon the county by the terms and provisions of title 9, chapter 21, with respect to the construction, operation, maintenance, financing and the fixing and collection of fees, rates, rents and other charges shall be available to and vested in the county with respect to the establishment, construction, installation, acquisition, operation, maintenance and financing of the refuse collection or disposal equipment or facility authorized pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1911; Acts 1988, ch. 750, §§ 6, 7.

5-19-112. Plan of services.

No county shall adopt the resolution provided for in § 5-19-103 until there shall have been presented to the regional planning commission serving such county a plan of services for a specified area or areas for study and a written report to be rendered within ninety (90) days after such submission unless, by resolution of the county legislative body or other governing body, a longer period is allowed.

Such plan of services shall set forth, at a minimum, the identification and proposed timing of the services to be rendered.

No county shall construct or acquire facilities under this chapter unless plans, including necessary engineering and financing plans, shall have been similarly presented to the planning commission for study and report.

In the event there is no such regional planning commission, then the referral shall be to the local planning commission of the largest municipality within the county having such a commission, and, if no municipality within the county has such a planning commission, to the state planning office [abolished].

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1912.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

5-19-113. Inspection of facilities.

The county sanitarian of each county shall, not less frequently than quarterly, inspect any and all refuse processing or refuse disposing facilities, or both, public or private, within the county for any practices or procedures followed in the county that do, or may, adversely affect the public health, the public safety, or the quality of the environment, and shall report the findings of the results of such inspections both to the board or governing body having jurisdiction over the area involved and to the superintendent.

The superintendent, within budgetary, policy and feasibility limits as such are defined by the board or governing body, will make every effort to correct any shortcomings in county-owned operations reported upon by the county sanitarian.

Such board or governing body may, in its discretion, institute corrective action on its own with reference to its own operations or initiate appropriate action designed to abate such practice or practices under terms of existing laws dealing with the abatement of nuisances or the elimination of hazards to the public health with reference to the refuse disposal operations of others within its jurisdiction.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 12; T.C.A., § 5-1913.

Compiler's Notes. There is no specific statutory provision for “the county sanitarian” referred to in this section although there is authority to “appoint and employ necessary employees” in § 5-19-107(5).

5-19-114. Investigations of facilities.

Either on the commissioner's own initiative or at the request of the governing body of any political subdivision of the state, the commissioner of environment and conservation may investigate refuse disposal operations within any county, city or town in the state, may make written or other recommendations for the improvement thereof, and may offer such technical advice and assistance to the responsible local officials for the betterment of refuse disposal practices within their jurisdictions as limitations of staff and budget will allow.

The commissioner may also draw up, publish, distribute information and recommend standards in refuse disposal for the consideration of responsible local officials.

The commissioner may delegate the responsibilities described in subsections (a) and (b) to appropriate personnel of the department of environment and conservation or to the director of a city, county or district health department to the extent deemed necessary.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 13; T.C.A., § 5-1914; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1.

5-19-115. Governmental entities' rights preserved.

Any of the provisions of this chapter notwithstanding, any municipality, utility or other special district shall retain existing rights to provide such garbage and rubbish collection services or disposal services, or both, to residents and taxpayers within its jurisdiction, including any territory annexed to such jurisdiction, and the existing rights of such instrumentalities to acquire disposal sites outside the limits of their jurisdictions shall not be impaired in any wise whatsoever.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 14; T.C.A., § 5-1915.

5-19-116. Householders' rights preserved.

This chapter shall not prohibit an individual householder from disposing of solid waste from such householder's own household upon such householder's own land; provided, that such disposal does not create a public nuisance or a hazard to the public health.

Acts 1969, ch. 201, § 15; T.C.A., § 5-1916.

Attorney General Opinions. Authorizing county legislative bodies to impose mandatory fee for solid waste disposal services provided by county, OAG 91-30, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 33 (4/8/91).